Utah statutes.
16-6a-1414.   Grounds for judicial dissolution.
(1)  A nonprofit corporation may be dissolved in a proceeding by the attorney
general or the division director if it is established that:
(a)  the nonprofit corporation obtained its articles of incorporation through
fraud; or
(b)  the nonprofit corporation has continued to exceed or abuse the authority
conferred upon it by law.
(2)  A nonprofit corporation may be dissolved in a proceeding by a member or
director if it is established that:
(a) (i)  the directors are deadlocked in the management of the corporate
affairs;
(ii)  the members, if any, are unable to break the deadlock; and
(iii)  irreparable injury to the nonprofit corporation is threatened or being
suffered;
(b)  the directors or those in control of the nonprofit corporation have
acted, are acting, or will act in a manner that is illegal, oppressive, or
fraudulent;
(c)  the members are deadlocked in voting power and have failed, for a period
that includes at least two consecutive annual meeting dates, to elect
successors to directors whose terms have expired or would have expired upon
the election of their successors; or
(d)  the corporate assets are being misapplied or wasted.
(3)  A nonprofit corporation may be dissolved in a proceeding by a creditor if
it is established that:
(a) (i)  the creditor's claim has been reduced to judgment;
(ii)  the execution on the judgment has been returned unsatisfied; and
(iii)  the nonprofit corporation is insolvent; or
(b) (i)  the nonprofit corporation is insolvent; and
(ii)  the nonprofit corporation has admitted in writing that the creditor's
claim is due and owing.
(4) (a)  If a nonprofit corporation has been dissolved by voluntary or
administrative action taken under this part:
(i)  the nonprofit corporation may bring a proceeding to wind up and liquidate
its business and affairs under judicial supervision in accordance with Section
16-6a-1405; and
(ii)  the attorney general, a director, a member, or a creditor may bring a
proceeding to wind up and liquidate the affairs of the nonprofit corporation
under judicial supervision in accordance with Section 16-6a-1405, upon
establishing the grounds set forth in Subsections (1) through (3).
(b)  As used in Sections 16-6a-1415 through 16-6a-1417:
(i)  a "judicial proceeding to dissolve the nonprofit corporation" includes a
proceeding brought under this Subsection (4); and
(ii)  a "decree of dissolution" includes an order of a court entered in a
proceeding under this Subsection (4) that directs that the affairs of a
nonprofit corporation shall be wound up and liquidated under judicial
supervision.
